Texas, session 892, HB138.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 13.073, Election Code, is amended by adding Subsection (d) to read as follows: (d)  In providing a written or oral reason for rejection under Subsection (a) or (b), the registrar shall identify which section or sections of the application resulted in the rejection. For each section identified, the registrar shall specify if the section was incomplete, was improperly filled out, or contained information identifying the applicant as ineligible to vote. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.